Washington statutes.
RCW 43.119.010

Commission established.

The Washington state women's commission is established in the office of the governor. The commission shall be administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The governor shall set the salary of the executive director. The executive director shall employ the staff of the commission.

[ 2018 c 98 s 2.]